public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.aff
FLAG UTF-8
SFX A ar isonse xberlefar
SFX A ar isonse xberlotar
SFX A ar isonse xberlumar
SFX A ar isonse xberxelar
SFX A ar isonse xelar
SFX A ar isonse xermojar
SFX A ar isonse xgoñar
SFX A ar isonse xlargiđar
SFX A ar isonse xmerdar
SFX A ar isonse xmerejar
SFX A ar isonse xmorgolar
SFX A ar isonse xnervađar
SFX A ar isonse xvergoñaŧar
SFX A ar isonse đurar
SFX A ar isonse ŧercar
SFX A ar isonse ŧitar
SFX A ar iven/L [abcdefmnpstvxñđŧ]olar
SFX A ar iven/L [abcdfgijknopstvxŧ]etar
SFX A ar iven/L [abcdfjkmpsv]iđar
SFX A ar iven/L [abcdfklnoprstuvxđŧ]inar
SFX A ar iven/L [abcefgijklmnpsvxđŧ]onar
SFX A ar iven/L [abdefklmopsvx]itar
SFX A ar iven/L [abdfgijklmnpstxñđ]orar
SFX A ar iven/L [abdfgikmst]urar
SFX A ar iven/L [abdfijkmnprstuŧ]elar
SFX A ar iven/L [abdgiotu]riđar
SFX A ar iven/L [abfgptu]regar
SFX A ar iven/L [abfjlnpr]utar
SFX A ar iven/L [abfkx]renar
SFX A ar iven/L [abfot]raŧar
SFX A ar iven/L [abik]rokar
SFX A ar iven/L [adiopt]ronar
SFX A ar iven/L [adklpstuvđŧ]enar
SFX A ar iven/L [aeilnsu]kar
SFX A ar iven/L [aeinosu]tegar
SFX A ar iven/L [aeio]strar
SFX A ar iven/L [aeiop]letar
SFX A ar iven/L [aeiou]xenar
SFX A ar iven/L [aeiru]ñar
SFX A ar iven/L [aeiu]ngar
SFX A ar iven/L [aelo]var
SFX A ar iven/L [aenoux]golar
SFX A ar iven/L [aeors]tiđar
SFX A ar iven/L [aeou]mentar
SFX A ar iven/L [agot]rejar
SFX A ar iven/L [ai]erar
SFX A ar iven/L [ai]ñaŧar
SFX A ar iven/L [ail]gar
SFX A ar iven/L [ailnou]sar
SFX A ar iven/L [ailnu]bar
SFX A ar iven/L [ailu]minar
SFX A ar iven/L [aiou]rmar
SFX A ar iven/L [aku]rifegar
SFX A ar iven/L [als]tar
SFX A ar iven/L [an]deđar
SFX A ar iven/L [an]fraxar
SFX A ar iven/L [an]kuerar
SFX A ar iven/L [an]kuirar
SFX A ar iven/L [ano]fegar
SFX A ar iven/L [ao]niđar
SFX A ar iven/L [ao]rcar
SFX A ar iven/L [ao]rdar
SFX A ar iven/L [ao]rdonar
SFX A ar iven/L [ao]rkar
SFX A ar iven/L [ao]rnar
SFX A ar iven/L [ao]rsar
SFX A ar iven/L [aou]rbar
SFX A ar iven/L [aou]rgar
SFX A ar iven/L [aou]rlar
SFX A ar iven/L [aou]rtar
SFX A ar iven/L [aou]rŧar
SFX A ar iven/L [ar]naliđar
SFX A ar iven/L [aux]nar
SFX A ar iven/L [bcdefgijmnpsvxđŧ]otar
SFX A ar iven/L [bcdfgjklmnpstvxđŧ]erar
SFX A ar iven/L [bcfgiklnoprtŧ]eđar
SFX A ar iven/L [bcfgjklmnoptuv]aŧar
SFX A ar iven/L [bcfilrtđ]ugar
SFX A ar iven/L [bcmpruŧ]efar
SFX A ar iven/L [bdegikmprstđ]aliđar
SFX A ar iven/L [bdflmvđ]ogar
SFX A ar iven/L [bdgklmnptuv]ajar
SFX A ar iven/L [bdgkpv]rar
SFX A ar iven/L [bdilmnopsvxñđŧ]egar
SFX A ar iven/L [bdklmoprtuv]acar
SFX A ar iven/L [bfilmtuv]antar
SFX A ar iven/L [bgknpstv]axar
SFX A ar iven/L [bjklmrt]oŧar
SFX A ar iven/L [blmpstvx]irar
SFX A ar iven/L [blprsvx]ear
SFX A ar iven/L [bmnpxŧ]igolar
SFX A ar iven/L [bou]rogar
SFX A ar iven/L [bp]erlar
SFX A ar iven/L [btv]ergar
SFX A ar iven/L [bxŧ]eregar
SFX A ar iven/L [cfglopsv]esar
SFX A ar iven/L [clmnrsv]odar
SFX A ar iven/L [dfgklmnopst]ejar
SFX A ar iven/L [dg]obar
SFX A ar iven/L [dgkmnprs]uar
SFX A ar iven/L [dijlorstuvxđ]entar
SFX A ar iven/L [dlnstxñŧ]ifegar
SFX A ar iven/L [dltv]ernar
SFX A ar iven/L [eilnu]ŧar
SFX A ar iven/L [eilox]mar
SFX A ar iven/L [einoru]xar
SFX A ar iven/L [einosu]car
SFX A ar iven/L [eiu]xurar
SFX A ar iven/L [eo]liđar
SFX A ar iven/L [eo]ntiđar
SFX A ar iven/L [es]kotar
SFX A ar iven/L [es]ŧervelar
SFX A ar iven/L [fjkx]ermar
SFX A ar iven/L [fklrsx]oñar
SFX A ar iven/L [fm]eretar
SFX A ar iven/L [fpvŧ]iolar
SFX A ar iven/L [fŧ]etuar
SFX A ar iven/L [gin]ritar
SFX A ar iven/L [iln]trar
SFX A ar iven/L [inru]jar
SFX A ar iven/L [io]ntar
SFX A ar iven/L [io]rkolar
SFX A ar iven/L [ipt]ađar
SFX A ar iven/L [ipu]lar
SFX A ar iven/L [irst]umar
SFX A ar iven/L [klt]ivar
SFX A ar iven/L [kp]avejar
SFX A ar iven/L [kt]erŧar
SFX A ar iven/L [ln]etrar
SFX A ar iven/L [lnoru]đar
SFX A ar iven/L [mp]eritar
SFX A ar iven/L [mv]ergolar
SFX A ar iven/L [ns]erbar
SFX A ar iven/L [ns]ervar
SFX A ar iven/L [ns]kuercar
SFX A ar iven/L [nsv]edar
SFX A ar iven/L [nx]goŧar
SFX A ar iven/L [op]ar
SFX A ar iven/L [ox]longar
SFX A ar iven/L [pt]resar
SFX A ar iven/L [pt]rotar
SFX A ar iven/L [stŧ]imentar
SFX A ar iven/L [sŧ]erkar
SFX A ar iven/L [tuv]iliđar
SFX A ar iven/L [tv]eriđar
SFX A ar iven/L [tv]erniđar
SFX A ar iven/L [xŧ]ertar
SFX A ar iven/L alar
SFX A ar iven/L alienar
SFX A ar iven/L amar
SFX A ar iven/L arar
SFX A ar iven/L bersajar
SFX A ar iven/L bertonar
SFX A ar iven/L bordeđar
SFX A ar iven/L dar
SFX A ar iven/L deramar
SFX A ar iven/L derenar
SFX A ar iven/L derivar
SFX A ar iven/L derobar
SFX A ar iven/L derokar
SFX A ar iven/L derotar
SFX A ar iven/L devorar
SFX A ar iven/L dexeredar
SFX A ar iven/L dexverxenar
SFX A ar iven/L donar
SFX A ar iven/L exerŧitar
SFX A ar iven/L far
SFX A ar iven/L fermentar
SFX A ar iven/L fumar
SFX A ar iven/L guernar
SFX A ar iven/L inbaretar
SFX A ar iven/L infervorar
SFX A ar iven/L inkartonar
SFX A ar iven/L interesar
SFX A ar iven/L interkalar
SFX A ar iven/L interkuerar
SFX A ar iven/L interkuirar
SFX A ar iven/L interlinear
SFX A ar iven/L intermeđar
SFX A ar iven/L interogar
SFX A ar iven/L interpretar
SFX A ar iven/L inŧercelar
SFX A ar iven/L kalar
SFX A ar iven/L kalefar
SFX A ar iven/L kantar
SFX A ar iven/L kolar
SFX A ar iven/L korniđar
SFX A ar iven/L kriolar
SFX A ar iven/L kurvar
SFX A ar iven/L lotar
SFX A ar iven/L lumar
SFX A ar iven/L lustrar
SFX A ar iven/L maravejar
SFX A ar iven/L menar
SFX A ar iven/L meravejar
SFX A ar iven/L merkantar
SFX A ar iven/L merkantiđar
SFX A ar iven/L međar
SFX A ar iven/L mojar
SFX A ar iven/L mudarar
SFX A ar iven/L ojar
SFX A ar iven/L okar
SFX A ar iven/L ormeđar
SFX A ar iven/L perdonar
SFX A ar iven/L perfumar
SFX A ar iven/L perifraxar
SFX A ar iven/L periodar
SFX A ar iven/L perkolar
SFX A ar iven/L perkotar
SFX A ar iven/L perletar
SFX A ar iven/L perlustrar
SFX A ar iven/L permudarar
SFX A ar iven/L permutar
SFX A ar iven/L perorar
SFX A ar iven/L perpetrar
SFX A ar iven/L perpetuar
SFX A ar iven/L perseguitar
SFX A ar iven/L personaliđar
SFX A ar iven/L persugar
SFX A ar iven/L pertegar
SFX A ar iven/L pongar
SFX A ar iven/L rajar
SFX A ar iven/L ramar
SFX A ar iven/L raxar
SFX A ar iven/L redar
SFX A ar iven/L rigolar
SFX A ar iven/L rivar
SFX A ar iven/L robar
SFX A ar iven/L roersar
SFX A ar iven/L rolar
SFX A ar iven/L sajar
SFX A ar iven/L scantiđar
SFX A ar iven/L seguitar
SFX A ar iven/L serajar
SFX A ar iven/L skortegar
SFX A ar iven/L sotolinear
SFX A ar iven/L spergoŧar
SFX A ar iven/L sperimentar
SFX A ar iven/L sperlongar
SFX A ar iven/L spernacar
SFX A ar iven/L speronar
SFX A ar iven/L sperđurar
SFX A ar iven/L steriliđar
SFX A ar iven/L sugar
SFX A ar iven/L terapienar
SFX A ar iven/L teraŧar
SFX A ar iven/L termenar
SFX A ar iven/L terminar
SFX A ar iven/L terŧariolar
SFX A ar iven/L tonar
SFX A ar iven/L tormentar
SFX A ar iven/L tuar
SFX A ar iven/L vejar
SFX A ar iven/L velar
SFX A ar iven/L verdeđar
SFX A ar iven/L vergiđar
SFX A ar iven/L vergoñar
SFX A ar iven/L verifegar
SFX A ar iven/L verigolar
SFX A ar iven/L verolar
SFX A ar iven/L versar
SFX A ar iven/L verxurar
SFX A ar iven/L verđelar
SFX A ar iven/L xberlefar
SFX A ar iven/L xberlotar
SFX A ar iven/L xberlumar
SFX A ar iven/L xberxelar
SFX A ar iven/L xelar
SFX A ar iven/L xermojar
SFX A ar iven/L xgoñar
SFX A ar iven/L xlargiđar
SFX A ar iven/L xmerdar
SFX A ar iven/L xmerejar
SFX A ar iven/L xmorgolar
SFX A ar iven/L xnervađar
SFX A ar iven/L xvergoñaŧar
SFX A ar iven/L đurar
SFX A ar iven/L ŧercar
SFX A ar iven/L ŧitar
SFX A ar ivense [abcdefmnpstvxñđŧ]olar
SFX A ar ivense [abcdfgijknopstvxŧ]etar
SFX A ar ivense [abcdfjkmpsv]iđar
SFX A ar ivense [abcdfklnoprstuvxđŧ]inar
SFX A ar ivense [abcefgijklmnpsvxđŧ]onar
SFX A ar ivense [abdefklmopsvx]itar
SFX A ar ivense [abdfgijklmnpstxñđ]orar
SFX A ar ivense [abdfgikmst]urar
SFX A ar ivense [abdfijkmnprstuŧ]elar
SFX A ar ivense [abdgiotu]riđar
SFX A ar ivense [abfgptu]regar
SFX A ar ivense [abfjlnpr]utar
SFX A ar ivense [abfkx]renar
SFX A ar ivense [abfot]raŧar
SFX A ar ivense [abik]rokar
SFX A ar ivense [adiopt]ronar
