public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/vec.dic
aflíxer/A
albeđar/A
alienar/A
inamidar/A
anemar/A
apostrofar/A
arđenar/A
arpiar/A
inasprir/A
aŧertar/A
dexautorar/A
axiar/A
badanar/A
bajar/A
xbaketar/A
xbalanŧar/A
inbalonar/A
rabaltar/A
bandir/A
xbankar/A
barafuxolar/A
xbarbatolar/A
barkiđar/A
rebasar/A
debàter/A
batocar/A
inbaular/A
xbaviđar/A
xbefeđar/A
bendar/A
xberlúxer/A
béver/A
bexoñar/A
biastemar/A
xbilanŧar/A
dexbingolar/A
sobisar/A
bixar/A
bocar/A
strabóɉer/A
rebokar/A
dexbolar/A
xbolsonar/A
rebonbar/A
xbonsegar/A
bordelar/A
bortir/A
boteđar/A
dexboŧar/A
xbraitar/A
inbragetar/A
brankar/A
xbratar/A
xbregar/A
xbrigar/A
broar/A
dexbroɉar/A
xbroentar/A
xbrufar/A
bruskiar/A
bufar/A
burlar/A
dexbutar/A
xbuxetar/A
scanŧar/A
scaređar/A
incefar/A
ascèñer/A
tracèñer/A
océñer/A
cexar/A
cipegar/A
conbar/A
indir/A
danar/A
dedegar/A
xdentegar/A
detar/A
dexinar/A
disipar/A
predíxer/A
doɉiđar/A
domar/A
kondonar/A
dorar/A
indoronar/A
drapar/A
adular/A
prededúxer/A
inđaltronar/A
đogatolar/A
sođónxer/A
đurar/A
inedukar/A
emular/A
epilogar/A
espèler/A
examenar/A
exíster/A
konfar/A
torefar/A
sfadegar/A
faldeɉar/A
falŧar/A
desfangar/A
infarinar/A
fatuar/A
favelar/A
falsifegar/A
paxifegar/A
verifegar/A
fénder/A
ferar/A
referir/A
fermentar/A
sfetar/A
infiakir/A
fiapir/A
sfibrar/A
infierir/A
filar/A
sfilaŧar/A
sfinir/A
sfiorar/A
prefisar/A
fitar/A
flosar/A
desfodrar/A
sfogonar/A
afolar/A
fondamentar/A
sforbeđar/A
sformar/A
fornir/A
straforŧar/A
frajar/A
sfranpuñar/A
infrapolir/A
desfratar/A
infraxar/A
fregolar/A
fríđer/A
frixar/A
sfroxar/A
refudar/A
fulminar/A
profumegar/A
fustegar/A
dexgabanar/A
galantejar/A
xgalonar/A
inganbarar/A
xgañolar/A
ingarbelar/A
ingatejar/A
globolar/A
gongolar/A
graduar/A
ingranerar/A
grapar/A
ringraŧiar/A
xgrénđer/A
xgriñar/A
xgronŧolar/A
inguantar/A
xguaŧar/A
inibir/A
dixinestar/A
inpresionar/A
interpretar/A
introitar/A
ɉaŧar/A
xɉonfar/A
akàder/A
kalar/A
kalkolar/A
skalumar/A
kontrakanbiar/A
skanpanar/A
kapar/A
skaponar/A
kareŧar/A
karpir/A
deskasar/A
katarar/A
skaturar/A
skavalar/A
inkietar/A
kojonar/A
kolegar/A
rekomandar/A
skonbàter/A
konpanegar/A
konteđar/A
konvoɉar/A
rekórer/A
skòrđer/A
skortegar/A
inkoŧir/A
skrekolar/A
krivelar/A
krostoliđar/A
inkuartar/A
skufonar/A
kumular/A
inkurvar/A
xlangolir/A
lardar/A
lavar/A
legaliđar/A
arlevar/A
xlipegar/A
delirar/A
xlogar/A
xlovar/A
deluviar/A
inmagaxenar/A
xmaltir/A
mankar/A
xmarar/A
inmarmorir/A
maskarar/A
matriđar/A
mediar/A
dexmenar/A
meravejar/A
eméter/A
mexurar/A
mirar/A
inmoɉar/A
momolar/A
xmónxer/A
xmorgar/A
motivar/A
tramudarar/A
musar/A
muxolar/A
nauxear/A
xnetar/A
noliđar/A
nuvolir/A
ocar/A
olir/A
onɉar/A
subordenar/A
inosar/A
inpacolar/A
inpaɉetar/A
palixar/A
spànder/A
parar/A
paređar/A
partikolariđar/A
spasiđar/A
espatriar/A
spaventar/A
inpeɉar/A
inpenir/A
konpenetrar/A
repeonar/A
perorar/A
repèter/A
repeŧar/A
traxpiantar/A
pierar/A
piolar/A
inpirolar/A
spiŧar/A
poer/A
spolveriđar/A
propóner/A
inpontar/A
ponxetar/A
spòrxer/A
despotifar/A
reprénder/A
priar/A
protokolar/A
purgar/A
irabiar/A
skorajar/A
ranponar/A
rausir/A
regolar/A
rexekar/A
riŧar/A
inrodolar/A
romanxinar/A
ropetar/A
dexruđenir/A
ruspar/A
skonsagrar/A
saldar/A
sangonar/A
insatanasar/A
scikar/A
strasekolar/A
persèguer/A
inselar/A
sentir/A
sepelir/A
insestar/A
asiderar/A
sindikar/A
skainar/A
skarpiar/A
inskeletrar/A
skoinar/A
deskríver/A
sofitar/A
insolfarar/A
insoñar/A
soverkiar/A
spaŧar/A
ispesir/A
despinar/A
spoɉar/A
spudar/A
stalar/A
statuir/A
instigar/A
stiŧar/A
strafuñar/A
kostrénđer/A
stroŧar/A
stukar/A
insubiotar/A
superar/A
stabarar/A
takir/A
tanbukiar/A
intardigar/A
intavanar/A
aténder/A
destenperar/A
intenutar/A
atèñer/A
intratéñer/A
esterminar/A
tikiñar/A
titubar/A
tonbolar/A
intorcar/A
kontòrđer/A
kontràer/A
tramacar/A
kontratar/A
destregolar/A
trikolar/A
intronbonar/A
tufar/A
ŧapar/A
ŧementar/A
deŧernir/A
ŧigar/A
deŧipar/A
ŧotar/A
uñolar/A
stravakar/A
revangar/A
vastar/A
dexvegrar/A
vénder/A
aveñir/A
arvèñer/A
verđelar/A
verolar/A
vesigar/A
viađar/A
viñar/A
vivatar/A
volar/A
volturar/A
traxalir/A
xbiegar/A
inxeñar/A
xirandolar/A
xñakar/A
